Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1578.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8904 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 8904. Duty of commission.The commission shall:* * *(5) Develop a process for preapproval of an applicant for the exemption from payment of real estate taxes, including when:(i) An applicant is waiting to receive the final determination from the United States Veterans Affairs Administration certifying the applicant as being a total or 100% permanent disability as required under section 1234567891011121314151617 8902(a)(2) (relating to exemption).(ii) An applicant shows evidence satisfactory to the commission that the applicant will meet the requirement under section 8902(a)(3) when in the process of purchasing and taking possession of a new dwelling.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1578PN1865 - 2 - 123456